Washington statutes.
RCW 43.340.050

Bonds.

(1) The authority may issue its bonds in principal amounts which, in the opinion of the authority, are necessary to provide sufficient funds for achievement of its purposes, the payment of debt service on its bonds, the establishment of reserves to secure the bonds, the costs of issuance of its bonds and credit enhancements, if any, and all other expenditures of the authority incident to and necessary to carry out its purposes or powers. The authority may also issue refunding bonds, including advance refunding bonds, for the purpose of refunding previously issued bonds, and may issue other types of bonds, debt obligations, and financing arrangements necessary to fulfill its purposes or the purposes of this chapter. The bonds are investment securities and negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for the purposes of the uniform commercial code.

(2) The authority's bonds shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, be in such denominations, be in such form, be registered or registrable in such manner, be made transferable, exchangeable, and interchangeable, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, be subject to such terms of redemption, bear such fixed or variable rate or rates of interest, be taxable or tax exempt, be payable at such time or times, and be sold in such manner and at such price or prices, as the authority determines. The bonds shall be executed by one or more officers of the authority, and by the trustee or paying agent if the authority determines to use a trustee or paying agent for the bonds. Execution of the bonds may be by manual or facsimile signature, provided that at least one signature on the bond is manual.

(3) The bonds of the authority shall be subject to such terms, conditions, covenants, and protective provisions as are found necessary or desirable by the authority, including, but not limited to, pledges of the authority's assets, setting aside of reserves, and other provisions the authority finds are necessary or desirable for the security of bondholders.

(4) Any revenue pledged by the authority to be received under the sales agreement or in special funds created by the authority shall be valid and binding at the time the pledge is made. Receipts so pledged and then or thereafter received by the authority and any securities in which such receipts may be invested shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act. The lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind against the authority, whether such parties have notice of the lien. Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the resolution or indenture of the authority or any other instrument by which a pledge is created need not be recorded or filed pursuant to chapter 62A.9A RCW to perfect such pledge. The authority shall constitute a governmental unit within the meaning of RCW 62A.9A-102.

(5) When issuing bonds, the authority may provide for the future issuance of additional bonds or parity debt on a parity with outstanding bonds, and the terms and conditions of their issuance. The authority may issue refunding bonds in accordance with chapter 39.53 RCW or issue bonds with a subordinate lien against the fund or funds securing outstanding bonds.

(6) The board and any person executing the bonds are not liable personally on the indebtedness or subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

(7) The authority may, out of any fund available therefor, purchase its bonds in the open market.

[ 2011 c 74 s 702; 2002 c 365 s 8.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—2011 c 74: See notes following RCW 62A.9A-102.